Illinois, session 104th, HB5179.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Protection of Neural Data Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Covered entity" means a person that uses or facilitates 8the use of a neural device to monitor, record, analyze, or 9manipulate the neural data of an individual. "Covered entity" 10does not include:11        (1) an individual who is licensed in Illinois to 12    provide health care services and who uses or facilitates 13    the use of a neural device to monitor, record, analyze, or 14    manipulate the neural data of an individual for a medical 15    purpose; or16        (2) a licensed health care facility.17    "Neural data" means information that:18        (1) concerns the activity of an individual's central 19    nervous system or peripheral nervous systems, including 20    the brain and spinal cord; and21        (2) can be monitored, recorded, analyzed, or 22    manipulated by a neural device.23    "Neural device" means a device that:  HB5179- 2 -LRB104 17766 JRC 31198 b1        (1) employs an electronic, optical, magnetic, 2    nanophysical, acoustical, or mechanical system; and3        (2) is capable of replacing, restoring, complementing, 4    improving, or otherwise modifying the response of the 5    individual's central nervous system to its internal or 6    external environment. 7    Section 10. Disclosure requirements.8    (a) A covered entity must do the following before using or 9facilitating the use of a neural device to monitor, record, 10analyze, or manipulate the neural data of an individual:11        (i) plainly disclose on the covered entity's website, 12    if any, all user agreements, privacy agreements, and other 13    terms that the covered entity requires an individual to 14    consent to use the covered entity's neural device; and15        (ii) plainly disclose to the individual:16            (a) all health and safety risks associated with 17        the use of the neural device;18            (b) whether the neural device collects data in 19        addition to whatever data collection is necessary to 20        perform the advertised or otherwise described function 21        of the neural device;22            (c) that the covered entity may not store or 23        otherwise retain the individual's neural data after 24        the individual's use of the neural device unless the 25        covered entity acquires the individual's consent to do   HB5179- 3 -LRB104 17766 JRC 31198 b1        so under Section 15;2            (d) that the covered entity may not transfer 3        possession of the individual's neural data to any 4        third party unless the covered entity acquires the 5        individual's consent to do so under Section 15; and6            (e) how the covered entity safeguards the privacy 7        of individuals' neural data. 8    Section 15. Consent requirements.9    (a) A covered entity may not store, retain, or transfer an 10individual's neural data unless the covered entity acquires 11the individual's consent to do so.12    (b) An individual who consents to allow a covered entity 13to store, retain, or transfer the individual's neural data may 14retract such consent at any time by notifying the covered 15entity electronically, telephonically, or in writing. A 16retraction is effective upon receipt by the covered entity. A 17covered entity that receives such a retraction must:18        (i) promptly cancel and deactivate the individual's 19    account and block any potential future transfer of the 20    individual's neural data to any third party; and21        (ii) within 30 days after receiving the retraction:22            (a) delete all neural data of the individual in 23        the covered entity's possession in a manner that 24        renders the neural data unrecoverable; and25            (b) contact each third party to which the covered   HB5179- 4 -LRB104 17766 JRC 31198 b1        entity has transferred possession of the individual's 2        neural data and instruct the third party to delete the 3        neural data. A third party that receives this 4        instruction from a covered entity must promptly comply 5        with the instruction. 6    Section 20. Enforcement and remedies. The Attorney General 7and State's Attorneys are authorized to enforce this Act.8    (a) A person that violates this Act commits a class 1 9misdemeanor. Notwithstanding subsection (b), if a court finds 10that a covered entity's violation of this Act is part of a 11pattern of noncompliance with this Act, the court may require 12the covered entity to pay a fine of not more than $50,000.    13    (b) An individual who suffers damages as a result of 14covered entity's violation of this Act may pursue a civil 15action to recover damages. The individual is presumed to have 16suffered damages in an amount not less than $10,000 if the 17court determines that a covered entity transferred possession 18of an individual's neural data to a third party in violation of 19this Act. 20    Section 25. Rules. The Attorney General may adopt rules as 21necessary for the implementation of this Act.